tests/verbs-TIA.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch10) tv.nn p2.pl":
    watu<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kuwatuneyo
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kulamhitameneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch9) tv.nn p3.pl":
    metakohm<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : metakhomeneyo
    kwetenem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : kwetenemeneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch10) tv.nn p3.pl":
    watu<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : uwatuneyo
    wlamhitam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : welamhitameneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch11) tv.nn p1.sg":
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkwetkenemen
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkwetkenemena
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkelenemen
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkelenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch12) tv.nn p1.sg":
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : newechilahtun
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : newechilahtuna
    melam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nemelamen
    melam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nemelamena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch11) tv.nn p2.sg":
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kwetkenemen
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kwetkenemena
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kelenemen
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kelenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch12) tv.nn p2.sg":
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kewechilahtun
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kewechilahtuna
    melam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kemelamen
    melam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kemelamena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch11) tv.nn p3.sg":
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kwetkenemen
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kwetkenemena
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kwelenemen
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kwelenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch12) tv.nn p3.sg":
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : wechilahtun
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : wechilahtuna
    melam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : melamen
    melam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : melamena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch11) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkwetkenemenen
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkwetkenemenena
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkelenemenena
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkelenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch12) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : newechilahtunen
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : newechilahtunena
    melam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemelamenen
    melam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemelamenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch11) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kwetkenemenen
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kwetkenemenena
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kelenemenen
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kelenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch12) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kewechilahtunen
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kewechilahtunena
    melam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kemelamenen
    melam<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kemelamenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch11) tv.nn p2.pl":
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kwetkenemeneneyo
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kelenemeneneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch12) tv.nn p2.pl":
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : wechilahtuneyo
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kemelameneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch11) tv.nn p3.pl":
    kwetkenem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : kwetkenemeneyo
    kelenem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : kwelenemeneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch12) tv.nn p3.pl":
    wechilahtun<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : wechilahtuneyo
    melam<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : melameneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.nn p1.sg":
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nemeshenemen
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nemeshenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.nn p2.sg":
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kemeshenemen
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kemeshenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.nn p3.sg":
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : mweshenemen
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : mweshenemena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemeshenemenen
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemeshenemenena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.nn p1.incl.pl":
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kemeshenemenen
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kemeshenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.nn p2.pl":
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p2><pl> : kemeshenemeneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch13) tv.nn p3.pl":
    meshenem<v><tv><nn><p3><pl> : mweshenemeneyo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) tv.nn p1.sg":        #Will split this up into multiple blocks
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nlelentamen
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nlelentamena 
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nlenemen
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nlenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) tv.nn p1.sg":
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntelhitehemaonen
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntelhitehemaonena
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkelamenen
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkelamenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 3) tv.nn p1.sg":
    michit<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nemichiten
    michit<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nemichitena
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntaskantamen
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntaskantamena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 4) tv.nn p1.sg":
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntahkenotemen
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntahkenotemena
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nteluwen
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nteluwena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 5) tv.nn p1.sg":
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nekshesemen
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nekshesemena
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntahkenutemen
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntahkenutemena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 6) tv.nn p1.sg":
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntowatowen
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntowatowena
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nlaxenemen
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nlaxenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.nn p1.sg":
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkoxptonen
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkoxptonena
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_sg> : natemenen
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p1><sg><o_pl> : natemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) tv.nn p2.sg":
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kelelentamen
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kelelentamena
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kelenemen
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kelenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) tv.nn p2.sg":
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktelhitehemaonen
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktelhitehemaonena
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kelamenen
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kelamenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 3) tv.nn p2.sg":
    michit<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kemichiten
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kemichitena
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktaskantamen
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktaskantamena
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 4) tv.nn p2.sg":
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktahkenotemen
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktahkenotemena
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kteluwen
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kteluwena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 5) tv.nn p2.sg":
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kshesemen
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kshesemena
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktahkenutemen
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktahkenutemena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 6) tv.nn p2.sg":
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktowatowen
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktowatowena
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kelaxenemen
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kelaxenemena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.nn p2.sg":
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : koxptonen
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : koxptonena
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kenatemenen
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kenatemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) tv.nn p3.sg":
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : welelentamen
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : welelentamena
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : lenemen
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : lenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) tv.nn p3.sg":
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : litehemaonen
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : litehemaonena
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kelamenen
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kelamenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 3) tv.nn p3.sg":
    michit<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : michiten
    michit<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : michitena
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : toskantamen
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : toskantamena
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 4) tv.nn p3.sg":
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : ahkenotemen
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : ahkenotemena
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : teluwen
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : teluwena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 5) tv.nn p3.sg":
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : kshesemen
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : kshesemena
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : ahkenutemen
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : ahkenutemena
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 6) tv.nn p3.sg":
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : owatowen
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : owatowena
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : laxenemen
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : laxenemena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.nn p3.sg":
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : koxptonen
    koxpton<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : koxptonena
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_sg> : natemenen
    natemen<v><tv><nn><p2><sg><o_pl> : natemenena
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nlelentamenen
    lelentam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nlelentamenena
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nlenemenen
    lenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nlenemenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntelhitehemaonenen
    litehemaon<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntelhitehemaonenena
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkelamenenen
    kelamen<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkelamenenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 3) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    michit<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemichitenen
    michit<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemichitenena
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntaskantamenen
    taskantam<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntaskantamenena
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 4) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntahkenotemenen
    ahkenotem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntahkenotemenena
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nteluwenen
    teluw<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nteluwenena

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 5) tv.nn p1.excl.pl":
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nekshesemenen
    kshesem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nekshesemenena
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntahkenutemenen
    ahkenutem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntahkenutemenena
    
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 6) tv.nn p1.excl.pl": 
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntowatowenen
    owatow<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntowatowenena
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nlaxenemenen
    laxenem<v><tv><nn><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nlaxenemenena
